Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1073.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 29 O.S. 2021, Section 3-103a, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3-103a. The Oklahoma Wildlife Conservation Commission
may, by order, authorize the Department of Wildlife Conservation to
issue, in addition to regular permits issued under this title, up to
five (5) special permits each year for designated species. The
special permits, which may be co-branded in association with the
Governor, shall be sold at public auction or by sealed bid, raffle,
or lottery. In the case of mountain lions and wildlife for which no
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1073 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

open season currently exists, the permits shall be conducted by
raffle. The Department may contract with nonprofit organizations or
charitable causes to conduct the public auctions.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON AGRICULTURE AND WILDLIFE
February 17, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS



















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1073 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)